Tennessee, session 114, SB2576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a pharmacy benefits manager
shall not reimburse a contracted pharmacy for a prescription drug or device or a
pharmacy service in an amount that is less than the greatest of:
(A) The actual cost to the pharmacy for the prescription drug or device or
pharmacy service;
(B) One hundred five percent (105%) of the national average drug
acquisition cost (NADAC) as calculated by the centers for medicare and
medicaid services and reflected in the most recently released public file for the
prescription drug or device or pharmacy service at the time the drug or device is
administered or dispensed or service is rendered;
(C) The wholesale acquisition cost (WAC) of the drug, as defined in 42
U.S.C. § 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B), if the national average drug acquisition cost is not
available at the time the drug is administered or dispensed; or
(D) The amount the pharmacy benefits manager reimburses the
pharmacy benefits manager's self or an affiliate for the same prescription drug or
device or pharmacy service on a per-unit basis using the same generic product
identifier or generic code number.
SB2576
012480
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(c)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A)
(i) A pharmacy benefits manager shall establish a process for a
pharmacy to appeal a reimbursement for failing to pay at least the actual cost to
the pharmacy for the prescription drug or device or pharmacy service.
(ii) If a pharmacy benefits manager fails to pay at least the amount
required by subdivision (c)(1)(B), (C), and (D) for the prescription drug or device
or pharmacy service, then the pharmacy may file a complaint against the
pharmacy benefits manager with the department of commerce and insurance.
(iii) It is a violation of this subsection (c) if a pharmacy benefits manager
or covered entity fails to reimburse the pharmacy at least the amount required by
subdivision (c)(1)(B), (C), and (D) for the prescription drug or device or pharmacy
service.
(iv) A pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity who fails to
reimburse a pharmacy at least the amount required by subdivision (c)(1)(B), (C),
and (D) for the prescription drug or device or pharmacy service shall pay the
pharmacy twice the amount owed to the pharmacy.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(c)(3)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B)
(i) It is a violation of this subsection (c) if, after an appeal in which a
pharmacy or agent acting on behalf of a pharmacy prevails, a pharmacy benefits
manager or covered entity fails to reimburse the pharmacy, at a minimum, the
actual cost within fourteen (14) days.
- 2 - 012480

(ii) A pharmacy benefits manager or covered entity who fails to reimburse
a pharmacy, as described in subdivision (c)(3)(B)(i), shall pay the pharmacy
twice the amount owed to the pharmacy.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(c)(4)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B)
(i) If the product associated with the national drug code number or unique
device identifier is not available at a cost that is less than the challenged rate of
reimbursement from the pharmaceutical wholesaler from whom the pharmacy
purchases the majority of prescription pharmaceutical products for resale, then
the pharmacy benefits manager shall adjust the challenged rate of
reimbursement to an amount equal to or greater than the appealing pharmacy's
actual cost for each claim affected by the inability to procure the pharmaceutical
product at a cost that is equal to or less than the previously challenged rate of
reimbursement. The pharmacy benefits manager shall pay or waive the cost of
any transaction fee required to reverse and rebill the claim.
(ii) A pharmacy benefits manager shall remit all additional monies owed
and provide claim-level details for the adjustments to the pharmacy and its
pharmacy services administrative organization within seven (7) business days of
the appeal determination.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(d), is amended by
deleting the subsection.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(e), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
- 3 - 012480

(e) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not include within the amount calculated
to reimburse a pharmacy pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) the amount of any professional
dispensing fee that is payable to the pharmacy.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(c)(3)(A)(iii), is amended
by deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(iii) Not require the challenging pharmacy to reverse and rebill the claim upon
which the appeal is based and waive or not require the challenging pharmacy to pay the
cost of any transaction fee or other fees required to reverse and rebill the claim;
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(c)(3)(A)(iv), is amended
by deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(iv) Pay all additional monies owed to the pharmacy and provide claim-level
details for the payment to the pharmacy and its pharmacy services administrative
organization within seven (7) business days;
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(c)(3)(A), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(vii) Apply the findings from the appeal as to the rate of the reimbursement and
actual cost for the particular drug or medical product or device to all remaining refills on
the issued prescription drug or medical product or device.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-3206(f), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(f) A pharmacy benefits manager shall pay a professional dispensing fee at a
rate that is not less than the amount paid by the TennCare program to a pharmacy if the
pharmacy dispenses a prescription drug or device pursuant to an agreement with the
pharmacy benefits manager or a covered entity. This professional dispensing fee must
- 4 - 012480

not be added on to the patient's copayment cost share, deductible, or otherwise passed
to the patient through any other out-of-pocket payment by the beneficiary.
SECTION 11. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to policies, plans, and contracts entered into, renewed, amended, or modified on or after
that date.
- 5 - 012480